Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Article 2.5. Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act.
§ 62.1-44.15:74.
Local governments to designate Chesapeake Bay Preservation Areas; incorporate into local plans and ordinances; impose civil penalties.

Counties, cities, and towns in Tidewater Virginia shall use the criteria developed by the Board to determine the extent of the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Area within their jurisdictions. Designation of Chesapeake Bay Preservation Areas shall be accomplished by every county, city, and town in Tidewater Virginia not later than 12 months after adoption of criteria by the Board.

Counties, cities, and towns in Tidewater Virginia shall incorporate protection of the quality of state waters into each locality’s comprehensive plan consistent with the provisions of this article.

All counties, cities, and towns in Tidewater Virginia shall have zoning ordinances that incorporate measures to protect the quality of state waters in the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Areas consistent with the provisions of this article. Zoning in Chesapeake Bay Preservation Areas shall comply with all criteria set forth in or established pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:72

.

Counties, cities, and towns in Tidewater Virginia shall incorporate protection of the quality of state waters in Chesapeake Bay Preservation Areas into their subdivision ordinances consistent with the provisions of this article. Counties, cities, and towns in Tidewater Virginia shall ensure that all subdivisions developed pursuant to their subdivision ordinances comply with all criteria developed by the Board.

(For expiration date — see notes) In addition to any other remedies which may be obtained under any local ordinance enacted to protect the quality of state waters in Chesapeake Bay Preservation Areas, counties, cities, and towns in Tidewater Virginia may incorporate the following penalties into their zoning, subdivision, or other ordinances:

Any person who (i) violates any provision of any such ordinance or (ii) violates or fails, neglects, or refuses to obey any local governmental body’s or official’s final notice, order, rule, regulation, or variance or permit condition authorized under such ordinance shall, upon such finding by an appropriate circuit court, be assessed a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000 for each day of violation. Such civil penalties may, at the discretion of the court assessing them, be directed to be paid into the treasury of the county, city, or town in which the violation occurred for the purpose of abating environmental damage to or restoring Chesapeake Bay Preservation Areas therein, in such a manner as the court may direct by order, except that where the violator is the county, city, or town itself, or its agent, the court shall direct the penalty to be paid into the state treasury.

With the consent of any person who (i) violates any provision of any local ordinance related to the protection of water quality in Chesapeake Bay Preservation Areas or (ii) violates or fails, neglects, or refuses to obey any local governmental body’s or official’s notice, order, rule, regulation, or variance or permit condition authorized under such ordinance, the local government may provide for the issuance of an order against such person for the one-time payment of civil charges for each violation in specific sums, not to exceed $10,000 for each violation. Such civil charges shall be paid into the treasury of the county, city, or town in which the violation occurred for the purpose of abating environmental damage to or restoring Chesapeake Bay Preservation Areas therein, except that where the violator is the county, city, or town itself, or its agent, the civil charges shall be paid into the state treasury. Civil charges shall be in lieu of any appropriate civil penalty that could be imposed under subdivision 1. Civil charges may be in addition to the cost of any restoration required or ordered by the local governmental body or official.

Localities that are subject to the provisions of this article may by ordinance adopt an appeal period for any person aggrieved by a decision of a board that has been established by the locality to hear cases regarding ordinances adopted pursuant to this article. The ordinance shall allow the aggrieved party a minimum of 30 days from the date of such decision to appeal the decision to the circuit court.

E.

(For effective date — see notes)

In addition to any other remedies which may be obtained under any local ordinance enacted to protect the quality of state waters in Chesapeake Bay Preservation Areas, counties, cities, and towns in Tidewater Virginia may incorporate the following penalties into their zoning, subdivision, or other ordinances:

1.

Any person who (i) violates any provision of any such ordinance or (ii) violates or fails, neglects, or refuses to obey any local governmental body’s or official’s final notice, order, rule, regulation, or variance or permit condition authorized under such ordinance shall, upon such finding by an appropriate circuit court, be assessed a civil penalty not to exceed $5,000 for each day of violation. Such civil penalties may, at the discretion of the court assessing them, be directed to be paid into the treasury of the county, city, or town in which the violation occurred for the purpose of abating environmental damage to or restoring Chesapeake Bay Preservation Areas therein, in such a manner as the court may direct by order, except that where the violator is the county, city, or town itself, or its agent, the court shall direct the penalty to be paid into the state treasury and deposited by the State Treasurer into the Stormwater Local Assistance Fund established by §

62.1-44.15:29.1

.

2.

With the consent of any person who (i) violates any provision of any local ordinance related to the protection of water quality in Chesapeake Bay Preservation Areas or (ii) violates or fails, neglects, or refuses to obey any local governmental body’s or official’s notice, order, rule, regulation, or variance or permit condition authorized under such ordinance, the local government may provide for the issuance of an order against such person for the one-time payment of civil charges for each violation in specific sums, not to exceed $10,000 for each violation. Such civil charges shall be paid into the treasury of the county, city, or town in which the violation occurred for the purpose of abating environmental damage to or restoring Chesapeake Bay Preservation Areas therein, except that where the violator is the county, city, or town itself, or its agent, the civil charges shall be paid into the state treasury and deposited by the State Treasurer into the Stormwater Local Assistance Fund established by §

62.1-44.15:29.1

. Civil charges shall be in lieu of any appropriate civil penalty that could be imposed under subdivision 1. Civil charges may be in addition to the cost of any restoration required or ordered by the local governmental body or official.

History.

1988, cc. 608, 891, § 10.1-2109; 1998, cc. 700, 714; 2008, c. 15; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2016, cc. 68, 758.

Subsection E set out twice.

The second version of subsection E above is effective on July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations pursuant to Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 9, whichever occurs later. For subsection E as in effect until that time, see the first version above.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 9 provides: “That the State Water Control Board (the Board) shall adopt regulations to implement the requirements of this act. The adoption of such regulations shall be exempt from the requirements of Article 2 (§

2.2-4006

et seq.) of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) of the Code of Virginia. However, the Department shall (i) provide a Notice of Intended Regulatory Action, (ii) form a stakeholders advisory group, (iii) provide for a 60-day public comment period prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations, and (iv) provide the Board with a written summary of comments received and responses to comments prior to the Board’s adoption of the regulations.”

Acts 2016, cc. 68 and 758, cl. 10, as amended by Acts 2017, c. 345, cl. 2, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective July 1, 2018, or 30 days after the adoption by the State Water Control Board of the regulations required by the ninth enactment of this act, whichever occurs later.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 68, in subdivision E 1, added “and deposited by the State Treasurer into the Stormwater Local Assistance Fund established by §

62.1-44.15:29.1

” to the end of the subdivision; and in subdivision E 2, inserted “and deposited by the State Treasurer into the Stormwater Local Assistance Fund established by §

62.1-44.15:29.1

.” For effective date, see Editor’s note.

Law Review.

For article, “Legal Issues Affecting Local Governments in Implementing the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act,” see 24 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (1989).

For an article reviewing key environmental developments at the federal and state levels during the period from June 1996 to June 1998, see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1217 (1998).

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 16-401 Land Sales Contract.

CIRCUIT COURT OPINIONS

City’s designation of streams and property reversed as ultra vires. —

City’s designation of streams as perennial and property surrounding the streams as as Resource Protection Areas under the city’s Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act, ordinance was improper and was reversed as ultra vires; the regulations implementing the Act prior to 2002 defined a tributary stream as a stream identified as perennial on the United States Geological Survey map, which the streams at issue were not, and there was no indication that the city had developed or used a scientifically valid system of in-field indicators of perennial flow, as required under 9 VAC 10-20-80 D, or that such system had been adopted into the local program and applied consistently, as required by the amended regulation. Pony Farm Assocs., L.L.C. v. City of Richmond, 62 Va. Cir. 386, 2003 Va. Cir. LEXIS 282 (Richmond Aug. 6, 2003) (decided under prior law).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Intervention by Chesapeake Bay Local Assistance Board. —

The Chesapeake Bay Local Assistance Board has authority to “intervene ” on its own or on behalf of a person who believes a local governing body is disregarding its zoning ordinances or misinterpreting certain criteria designed to protect the quality of state waters, and the Board is also authorized to institute or take administrative and legal actions to ensure compliance with the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Michael D. Clower, Executive Director, Chesapeake Bay Local Assistance Department, 00-087, 2001 Va. AG LEXIS 24 (11/26/01) (decided under prior law).

§ 62.1-44.15:75.
Local governments outside of Tidewater Virginia may adopt provisions.

Any local government, although not a part of Tidewater Virginia, may employ the criteria developed pursuant to §

62.1-44.15:72

and may incorporate protection of the quality of state waters into their comprehensive plans, zoning ordinances, and subdivision ordinances consistent with the provisions of this article.

History.

1988, cc. 608, 891, § 10.1-2110; 2013, cc. 756, 793.

§ 62.1-44.15:76.
Local government requirements for water quality protection.

Local governments shall employ the criteria promulgated by the Board to ensure that the use and development of land in Chesapeake Bay Preservation Areas shall be accomplished in a manner that protects the quality of state waters consistent with the provisions of this article.

History.

1988, cc. 608, 891, § 10.1-2111; 2013, cc. 756, 793.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Intervention by Chesapeake Bay Local Assistance Board. —

The Chesapeake Bay Local Assistance Board has authority to “intervene ” on its own or on behalf of a person who believes a local governing body is disregarding its zoning ordinances or misinterpreting certain criteria designed to protect the quality of state waters, and the Board is also authorized to institute or take administrative and legal actions to ensure compliance with the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act. See opinion of Attorney General to Mr. Michael D. Clower, Executive Director, Chesapeake Bay Local Assistance Department, 00-087, 2001 Va. AG LEXIS 24 (11/26/01) (decided under prior law).

§ 62.1-44.15:77.
Effect on other governmental authority.

The authorities granted herein are supplemental to other state, regional, and local governmental authority. No authority granted to a local government by this article shall affect in any way the authority of the Board. No authority granted to a local government by this article shall limit in any way any other planning, zoning, or subdivision authority of that local government.

History.

1988, cc. 608, 891, § 10.1-2113; 2013, cc. 756, 793.

§ 62.1-44.15:78.
State agency consistency.

All agencies of the Commonwealth shall exercise their authorities under the Constitution and laws of Virginia in a manner consistent with the provisions of comprehensive plans, zoning ordinances, and subdivision ordinances that comply with §§

62.1-44.15:74

and

62.1-44.15:75

.

History.

1988, cc. 608, 891, § 10.1-2114; 2013, cc. 756, 793.

§ 62.1-44.15:79.
Vested rights protected.

The provisions of this article shall not affect vested rights of any landowner under existing law.

History.

1988, cc. 608, 891, § 10.1-2115; 2013, cc. 756, 793.